Utah statutes.
53-7-226.   Violations -- Misdemeanor.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he:

(1)  violates this part;

(2)  violates any order made under this part;

(3)  produces, reproduces, or uses the official seal of registration of the division in any manner or for any purpose inconsistent with the designated purpose of the seal;

(4)  removes, uses, or damages service tags or other labels or markings in a manner inconsistent with the designated use of the service tag;

(5)  engages in the sale, storage, or handling of class C fireworks without a permit where a local government requires a permit;

(6)  sells at retail, transports, possesses, or discharges class C dangerous explosives as defined in Section 53-7-202;

(7)  performs or intends to perform services or induces the public to enter into any obligation relating to the performance of those services that are untrue, misleading, or reasonably known to be untrue or misleading; or

(8)  builds in violation of the division's plan review or written instructions conducted on building specifications, building plans, or amendments of those specifications or plans as required under this part.

